Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.320

Contact with animals—Rules.

(1) A nursing home licensee shall give each patient a reasonable opportunity to have regular contact with animals. The licensee may permit appropriate animals to live in the facilities and may permit appropriate animals to visit if the animals are properly supervised.

(2) The department shall adopt rules for the care, type, and maintenance of animals in nursing home facilities.

[ 1984 c 127 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—1984 c 127: "The legislature finds that the senior citizens of this state, particularly those living in low-income public housing or in nursing homes, often lead lonely and harsh lives. The legislature recognizes that the warmth and companionship provided by pets can significantly improve the quality of senior citizens' lives. This legislation is intended to insure that senior citizens and persons in nursing homes will not be deprived of access to pets." [ 1984 c 127 s 1.]